dictsource/mn_rules
// л is a lateral FRICATIVE. It is voiceless [ɬ] at word edges and
// next to a voiceless consonant, voiced [ɮ] only between vowels.
.group л
        // ь + an iotated vowel is a fully VOICED environment -- the vowel before
        // it and the /j/ after it are both voiced -- so л takes the voiced
        // lateral, the same as the `L04) л (L04` rule below. This read l#
        // (voiceless) and gave алье [aɬje] against алаа [aɮaː], which is the
        // same group contradicting its own voicing rule.
        L04) л (ьL08    l
        л (ьL08         l#
        // Word-final ль surfaces as a GLIDE BEFORE the lateral, not as a
        // palatalised lateral after it: сургууль is [surɢuːi̯ɬ], "сургуйл",
        // not [surɢuːʎ] which a native speaker heard as "сургуули".
        // The lateral itself stays voiceless, exactly as in сургуул.
        л (ь_           jl#
        л (ь            l;
        _) л            l#
        л (_            l#
        л (L06          l#
        L06) л          l#
        // An intervocalic GEMINATE is just as voiced as a single intervocalic
        // л, but the rule below needs a vowel on both sides and a doubled
        // letter puts a consonant on one, so both halves fell through to the
        // voiceless l# -- байгууллага [pai̯quːɬɬaqa], долларын [tɔɬɬariŋ].
        // Khalkha л is /ɮ/, devoicing only next to a voiceless segment or at a
        // word edge; a geminate between two vowels has neither. Both halves
        // take the voiced lateral, matching алаа below.
        L04) л (лL04    l       // first half:  V _ л V
        L04л) л (L04    l       // second half: V л _ V
        L04) л (L04     l
        л               l#

.group р
        р (ьL08     r
        р (ь        r;
        р           r

.group й
        й           j


// -- Signs ------------------------------------------------------
//
// ь and ъ are both silent. ь does its work through the `(ь`
// post-context rules in the consonant groups above; ъ merely blocks
// palatalisation, and the following я/ё/ю/е supplies its own glide.

.group ь
        ь

.group ъ
        ъ


// ============================================================
//  LATIN-SCRIPT FALLBACK
//
//  Untransliterated loanwords (product names, URLs, email
//  addresses) are read with Mongolian phonology rather than spelled
//  out letter by letter.
// ============================================================

.group a
        a       a
.group b
        b (L11	p
        L11) b	p
        b		p@
.group c
        ch      tSh
        c (L11	kh
        L11) c	kh
        c		kh@
.group d
        d (L11	t
        L11) d	t
        d		t@
.group e
        e       e
.group f
        f (L11	f
        L11) f	f
        f		f@
.group g
        g (L11	k
        L11) g	k
        g		k@
.group h
        h (L11	x
        L11) h	x
        h		x@
.group i
        i       i
.group j
        j (L11	tS
        L11) j	tS
        j		tS@
.group k
        k (L11	kh
        L11) k	kh
        k		kh@
.group l
        l (L11	l#
        L11) l	l#
        l		l#@
.group m
        m (L11	m
        L11) m	m
        m		m@
.group n
        n (L11	n
        L11) n	n
        n		n@
.group o
        o       O
.group p
        ph      f
        p (L11	ph
        L11) p	ph
        p		ph@
.group q
        q (L11	kh
        L11) q	kh
        q		kh@
.group r
        r (L11	r
        L11) r	r
        r		r@
.group s
        sh      S
        s (L11	s
        L11) s	s
        s		s@
.group t
        th      th
        t (L11	th
        L11) t	th
        t		th@
.group u
        u       U
.group v
        v (L11	w
        L11) v	w
        v		w@
.group w
        w (L11	w
        L11) w	w
        w		w@
.group x
        x (L11	khs
        L11) x	khs
        x		khs@
.group y
        y (L11	j
        L11) y	j
        y		j@
.group z
        z (L11	ts
        L11) z	ts
        z		ts@
// ============================================================
//  SIGNS BEFORE A NUMBER
//
//  A hyphen at the start of a word and directly before a digit is a
//  minus sign, not a hyphen: -30 хэм is "хасах гучин хэм". Without
//  this the sign is silently dropped and -30 reads as 30, which in
//  Mongolian weather text inverts the meaning. The other two cases
//  match en_rules: a digit on both sides is a dash (2010-2020), and
//  anything else before a digit is left silent.
// ============================================================

.group -
    __) - (_D      Xasa#X
    D_) - (_D      tsUra:s
     _) - (_D      _
